Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-256
Public safety; disturbing the peace; power to punish.

A primary city may punish disturbance of the peace or good order, clamor, intoxication, drunkenness, fighting, obscene or profane language, or other violations of the public peace by indecent or disorderly conduct, or blockading any street, sidewalk, way or space, or interfering with the passing of people.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, LVI, p. 141;

R.S.1913, § 4466;

C.S.1922, § 3851;

C.S.1929, § 15-254;

R.S.1943, § 15-256.